Washington statutes.
RCW 38.04.030

Composition of the militia.

The militia of the state of Washington shall consist of all able bodied citizens of the United States and all other able bodied persons who have declared their intention to become citizens of the United States, residing within this state, who shall be more than eighteen years of age, and shall include all persons who are members of the national guard and the state guard, and said militia shall be divided into two classes, the organized militia and the unorganized militia.

[ 1989 c 19 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 55; 1963 c 74 s 1; 1943 c 130 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-2. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 1; 1909 c 134 s 2; 1895 c 108 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Militia—Who liable to military duty: State Constitution Art. 10 s 1.